Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 8. Joint Water Management Districts
§ 51-8-47.
Rates, fees, tolls, and charges; penalties for nonpayment.

The board of commissioners of the district issuing bonds pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees, tolls or charges for the services, facilities and commodities of its system or systems; shall prescribe penalties for the nonpayment thereof; and shall revise such rates, fees, tolls or charges from time to time whenever necessary to insure the economic operation of such system or systems. The rates, fees, tolls or charges prescribed shall be, as nearly as possible, such as will always produce revenue at least sufficient to:

Provide for all expenses of operation and maintenance of the system or systems, including reserves therefor;

Pay when due all bonds and interest thereon for the payment of which such revenues are or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, including reserves therefor; and

Provide funds for reasonable expansions, extensions and improvements of services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-49.
Tax exemption.

The property and revenue of such district shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation. Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes, and it may be so stated on the face of said bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-51.
Construction contracts.

All construction contracts by the district shall be made in accordance with the laws governing public contracts for counties and municipalities, being Sections 31-5-3 through 31-5-57.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-53.
Annexation of adjacent area; services within annexed territory.

Any area adjacent to any district created pursuant to this chapter may be annexed to and become a part of such district by the same procedure as prescribed for the original creation of the district. All costs incident to the publication of notice and all other costs incident to the hearings, election and proceedings shall be paid by the district.

The district shall have the exclusive right to provide any of the services for which it was created in the annexed territory; however, if any part of the annexed territory is then being served by another corporate agency with any such service, the district shall, at the option of the other corporate agency, either relinquish its prior right to serve the area occupied by the corporate agency or acquire by purchase the facilities of such corporate agency, together with its franchise rights to serve such area.

If the option is for the district to purchase, upon notification thereof, the district shall be obligated to buy and pay for, and the corporate agency shall be obligated to convey to the district, all its service facilities and franchise rights in the annexed area. Such property shall be acquired by the district in accordance with such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon, and the district shall have the authority to assume the operation of such entire system or facility and to assume and become liable for the payment of any notes, bonds or other obligations that are outstanding against said system or facility and payable from the revenues therefrom.

If the district is notified to relinquish its prior right to serve the annexed area, the district shall grant the corporate agency a franchise to serve within the annexed territory; however, the corporate agency shall be entitled to serve only such customers or locations within the annexed area as it served on the date that such annexation became effective.

The annexed territory shall become liable for any existing indebtedness of the district and be subject to any taxes levied by a local governing body under Section 51-8-43.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-55.
Agreements with state or federal government.

The board of commissioners of any district created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall have the authority to enter into cooperative agreements with the state or federal government, or both; to obtain financial assistance in the form of loans or grants as may be available from the state or federal government, or both; and to execute and deliver at private sale notes or bonds as evidence of such indebtedness in the form and subject to the terms and conditions as may be imposed by the state or federal government, or both; and to pledge the income and revenues of the district, or the income and revenues from any part of the area embraced in the district, in payment thereof. It is the purpose and intention of this section to authorize districts to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the state or federal government, or both, in the planning, construction, maintenance or operation of project facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-57.
Applicability of municipal standards.

When any district is created within three (3) miles of the corporate boundaries of any existing municipality, the municipality is empowered to require such district to construct and maintain all facilities, whether purchased or constructed, to standards commensurate with those of the adjoining municipality; provided, however, the governing authorities of the municipalities may specifically waive compliance with any or all of such requirements.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-59.
Additional statutory authority not required.

The provisions of this chapter, without reference to any other statute or statutes, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the creation of such districts and for the issuance of such bonds. No proceedings shall be required for the creation of such districts or for the issuance of such bonds other than those provided for and required herein. All the necessary powers to be exercised by the governing bodies of member local governing units and by the board of commissioners of any such district, in order to carry out the provisions of such sections, are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-61.
Publication and filing of annual statement; contents.

Within ninety (90) days after the close of each fiscal year, the board of commissioners shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a sworn statement showing the financial condition of the district, the earnings for the fiscal year just ended, a statement of the water and sewer rates being charged and a brief statement of the method used in arriving at such rates. Such statement shall also be filed with the local governmental units creating the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 481, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 51-8-63.
Corporate body, acquisition and assumption of powers, duties and responsibilities of joint water management district; petition; water management plan; grant of water management district status.

If authorized pursuant to Section 51-9-121, 51-11-13, 51-13-111 or 51-15-119, as applicable, any corporate body organized under the provisions of Chapters 9, 11, 13 and 15 of Title 51, Mississippi Code of 1972, may elect by resolution duly adopted by its board of directors, to acquire and assume the power, duties and responsibilities of a joint water management district as set forth in Sections 51-8-27 through 51-8-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, by petitioning the Commission on Environmental Quality. The petition shall be in the form and content as prescribed by the commission and shall state the intention of the district to perform functions meeting the purposes for the creation of joint water management districts set out in Section 51-8-3, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The commission may deny, grant preliminary approval of the petition and request additional information or grant preliminary approval of the petition and direct the district to proceed with the formulation of a water management plan for the district.

No petition shall be finally and unconditionally granted until the district has submitted to the commission a water management plan for the district that meets the criteria set forth by the commission. Upon submission of a district water management plan and the satisfactory completion of any other requirements, the commission may finally and unconditionally approve the district’s petition and grant the district joint water management district status.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 616, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 51-8-65.
Creation of joint district, approval of Commission required; approval of water management plan a condition for creation; amendments to plan; permits, grants and loans to be consistent with plan.

From and after July 1, 1995, no joint water management district shall be created without the approval of the Commission on Environmental Quality. The commission may establish criteria for the approval of a request to create a joint water management district, but may not finally approve a request and grant joint water management district status until a water management plan for the proposed district has been approved by the commission. Any amendments to the district’s water management plan must also be approved by the commission.

After the granting of joint water management district status to a district by the commission, neither the department, the permit board nor any other agency in the State of Mississippi shall issue any permit, grant or loan for any water related facility or project that is not consistent with a district’s water management plan.

In its consideration of the consistency of a project, grant or loan with a district’s water management plan, the department, permit board or other agency shall notify the affected water management district of the request for a permit, grant or loan and give the district a reasonable time, but not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days, to respond to the request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 616, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.